District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this Act
may be cited as the “Hygiene and Laundry Access Pilot Program Act of 2025”.

Sec. 2. Establishment of Third-Party Public Shower Facility Pilot Program.
(a) The Department of Public Works (“DPW”) shall establish a pilot program to provide
grants to organizations for the purpose of establishing and managing publicly accessible shower
and laundry facilities.
(b) Within 30 days after October 1, 2025, the Mayor shall solicit proposals from
organizations to provide public shower and laundry facilities in the District.
(c) Pursuant to the solicitation provided for in subsection (b) of this section, DPW shall
provide a grant to each selected organization and enter into a Memorandum of Understanding
with each selected organization requiring that the organization:
(1) Purchase or otherwise provide at least one (1) public shower facility in the
District of Columbia that:

(A) Is compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990,
approved July 26, 1990 (104 Stat. 327; 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.); and
(B) Has running water for showers, or can access running water through a
municipal water connection;
(2) Provide necessary supplies for use of the shower, including shampoo,
conditioner, body wash, disposable razors, washcloths, and towels;
(3) Provide equipment and supplies for clothing laundry;
(4) Make the facility available to the public at least twelve days each month for at
least six hours a day, with a portion of the hours taking place between 3:00 PM and 9:00 PM;
(5) Provide adequate staff to facilitate the public’s safe and secure use of the
shower and laundry during the hours the facility is in operation;
(6) Offer secure, temporary storage for individuals to store their belongings while
using the shower and laundry facilities; and
(7) Collect data and provide reports to DPW at least every six months on:
(A) Public shower and laundry facility usage by date and time;
(B) Incidents of misuse or vandalism;
(C) How facilities were accessed;
(D) Cleanliness; and
(E) User experience.
(d) In the case of dangerous weather conditions, such as below-freezing temperatures or
severe thunderstorms, occurring on the day an organization has scheduled shower availability,
the organization shall make a reasonable attempt to reschedule the relevant hours within the
same month or the immediately following month.

(e) DPW shall consult with the Deputy Mayor for Health and Human Services to select
facility locations that will meet the needs of unhoused residents and shall ensure that the initial
locations of facilities include:
(1) At least one facility that primarily operates Downtown within the Northwest
quadrant of the District;
(2) At least one facility that primarily operates within the Northeast quadrant of
the District;
(3) At least one facility that primarily operates within the Southeast quadrant of
the District;
(4) At least one facility that primarily operates within the Southwest quadrant of
the District; and
(5) At least one facility that primarily operates east of the Anacostia River.
(f) Within 1 month after the completion of the pilot program, DPW shall provide
information to the Council and the Mayor that includes:
(1) Total cost of the program, and a breakdown of those costs;
(2) Monthly facility usage rates for each facility;
(3) Data related to how customers accessed the facilities;
(4) Any incidents of misuse or vandalism; and
(5) Data related to user experience.
Sec. 3. Rules.
The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; DC Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue rules to
implement the provisions of this Act.

Sec. 4. Applicability.
This Act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and
financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in
a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; DC Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This Act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; DC Official Code § l-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.